Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 9
REPEAL OF THE DEATH PENALTY

16-11-901. Death penalty repeal - applicability - current sentences.

For offenses charged on or after July 1, 2020, the death penalty is not a sentencing option for a defendant convicted of a class 1 felony in the state of Colorado. Nothing in this section commutes or alters the sentence of a defendant convicted of an offense charged prior to July 1, 2020. This section does not apply to a person currently serving a death sentence. Any death sentence in effect on July 1, 2020, is valid.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire part added, (SB 20-100), ch. 61, p. 204, § 1, effective March 23.